Beyond the Trees

Lucifer









Now then have the thinking of a soldier of David, and not the thinking of the soldiers of cities, for you citizens are able, for why should you hate your own people? But if they place some of your own in a place that they are having to take unorthodox places in society, then why will the soldiers be against them? But if they can attack with a person's own people, they will continue to attack in this way, for the foreign nation is always having agents in your land, and it is the ongoing cold war.

Now then the entertainments and the clouds, when compiled, it seemed to be a demon who was for entertaining the people, and a strange demon he was, and part of his humour was to portray common misunderstandings people might have at times, the misunderstandings of people in their consideration of things, and it was his sense of humour for a time, and he also showed a multitude of things based upon wrong understanding of things, and incomplete understanding of things, and he was as the person who exploits what they do not understand, and he lied much, and mocked the insecurities of people, for he lacked cleverness to produce what was funny, and a strange demon was he, and yet he seemed to like people and wanted to entertain them. Now then when a person excises these things, it goes out and then later returns to them, and sometimes worse than what they had ever indulged in, and it is even a thing congruent with that of a demon, for the demon is much like a demon, it might be imagined.

Now then dump not sewage into a river, for will a being that is mighty destroy your nation? Now then throw not dung at a holy mountain, for the holy mountain may destroy your country for it. Now then keep the dung that walks and is in person form away from the holy mountain, for your nation is casting dung at the holy mountain, and it may be destroyed.

Now then the atheist hand-waves greatly in consideration of the future, for he does so much, that it is understood he desires to fly, but where or to what he does not know, only that he desires to fly and for all of humanity, he wants humanity to fly, and yet the flight is only for him. 

Now those entitled to villainy because of history and the entertainments, the axe falls swiftly in reality, and the bud is sufficient for the knife.

Love like wine

I guess a revelation, can wait there for a time,
there's something in the back-drop, its seems like it is mine,
and the sky seems to grow distant, with the coming of the light,
and if you find me in the darkness, I know that this will be alright,
the ocean grew much greater, the star broke out aloud,
and your love was a pure symbol, of what could call me out,
the young went to the edge, they saw what they would know,
if the world was then forgotten, they would know where it would go,

and all, this seems, like desire, and the falling away,
away it goes, and time will see,
there's nothing more,
it's for you and me, this time,

and it seems, love cannot go, away, and there is another sign,
and it is there in the dark,
it's for you and me, this time,
come on save me from this all,
come on and give me light this time,
I can feel this through it all,
it's love, like wine,

I think I knew the answer, I think I heard the sound,
before the kingdoms shattered, before the words they only found,
and it seems to be yours this time, the questions that they know,
they knew the field they saw, they marched it row by row,
and it came to the river, it came to be delivered,
it came from its desire, it came from an empire,
and it was shining light, upon their eyes,
and they told the truth, and confessed the lies,
and they moved with speed, and they were the first,
to receive the gift, to take them past the hurt, of the Earth,

The roles of a former generation are expired by the next generation, for they are no longer required, many of the roles, and so a generation has not required many of the roles of a former generation that were required, for whether abject, hated, or liked, many of these things are expired, and the next generation has removed a many roles so that retirement is for them. Now then those who linger, they receive evil upon evil, as they will not retire, for they have played their part and been for a former generation and the evils of the day required different roles. Now the generation prior to Dagon, it was a generation of remorse and guilt, and a generation of compassion, for they went about teaching their children not to be evil, and it was the evil of a former time and their time, things they did and a former generation did, for they were a repenting generation under the sun.

Now then understand the language that is your own, for mentally retarded has not meant mentally challenged, and faggot, not homosexual, and nigger, not dark shade, and insane and crazy, not mentally ill, for only some meant these things wrong.

Now the ideology of remorse turns to dung, and it swarms the land as warfare, and if it is for some ideology of priests, it is not required, for the priest-hood of Japeth does not require it, for the dung becomes warfare to the land.

The world is strange that it has come to the giant Sasquatch rising from the depths, for it has been woken by something, perhaps the coming of the fourth day, and it is about the might of a great nation, if not more, and it is powerful that it may ruin the whole Earth, for it spreads out and the stones cannot fight it adequately, and it is moving upon the Earth, rising up to overthrow, for it attacks the Earth, and it is in Eretz Chadrack also, and also there is the giant Chicken, which has it real leaders already, or will have them when it is ready, and so the chicken will return as a bird that can fly, a peaceful bird, likely.

Now then what portion of humanity was not descending down to hell, and what portion was staying with the people, to continue to be people? But there were servant all gathered into a people, those who had not been on land, and they were not speaking the same language as people, but though they spoke with their words, yet their language was not the same, for there was a great off-set to all of their words.

Now for the language of the business people, who can afford a thing by fulfillment, can have a thing, for if they will pay taxes to the nation, tithe to God, purchase from the excellent seller, indeed they are able to afford and to become great, and to the people, they desire they purchase from the excellent seller, for this is a person who was not lacking to gain, and pretending to have more riches than they had, but this is a person who could afford a thing and fulfilled, for a mountain below ice is not the same as a mountain above land.

Now it is so that many things come up from below ice to be on land, and there is the change of them, for the ice berg, the wealthy business person, he becomes a great tree, that is large than any tree any person has ever seen, for brontosaurus cannot even hope to reach the leaves, for the tree is like a mountain.

Now the seal becomes a person.

Now the country will be destroyed, for there are countries that are destroyed behind their walls, and the other countries do not know, and the country that survives, it will be a different country than the country that was destroyed and they will say that nothing occurred.

Now the viruses of people, those who are part of a large virus, they are becoming far more resilient to reason, and reason no longer gives them much pause, for they slip past it with ease, for the viruses have come from dung and they are dung viruses that spread over the Earth.

Now the ice-berg is a rich man early, when he has become rich, and later, if he fulfills that which is for fulfilling, he is a very large tree, called a great wealthy, and it was only a tree that had fulfilled that was offered fruit that it could become a god, Mars, for it was possible for a great wealthy.

Now then the soldiers of Niagra Falls advance, there are Muslim leaders who are too smart to believe, and also some Muslims, and in Eretz Chadrack the prices increase and the people are plagued by many destructive things in the south of Eretz Chadrack, and the mentally retarded, and not the mentally challenged, they are always randomly forming their mobs to attack what is exceptional, for it is a thing of nature that the mentally retarded do this. Now then society is never vanished, unless the nation is already vanished, and what is the purpose of evil then?

Now not every seal becomes a person, and not everything in the Ocean, a thing upon land.

Now drink great wealthy, from my river, and brontosaurus, Eskimo, mountain tribes, soil, and those things that are on land, and each people must do as is right for them and what pleases them as is right for them, and so the atheist will fly and other people will fly, and they will not fly in the same way.

Now then I wrote that you should turn criminals into the police, and yet do you do so when there are bad times where the people are placed in a bad place that they must take up an unorthodox place in society? Now then if some of these things are as if terrorists, why will they be considered terrorists, when they are the people, for should the people be destroyed by the soldiers of their own nation when foreign agents drove them to be terrorists who are for the benefit of their own nation? Now I call these loyal terrorists, and I do not believe that the soldiers should be killing loyal terrorists, but that loyal terrorists are the people who have been attacked, so save the nation, and let the soldiers save the nation, for the people are badly divided by things like INCEL, crime, less-knowing, accomplished in knowing, loyal activists, loyal freedom fighters, and all the directions the loyal have gone, for if they were scattered and re-group, do they not only fight again, and with better ability, after being scattered, than when they were in their prior places. Now then those who believe in the just-world hypothesis, especially during bad times, they are an obnoxious and grievous thing, as a burden to the air with their words, for they have lived in another land, perhaps. Now then why will these be pursued much by the police, or turned over to the police by you? But if the giant Sasquatch, or some other beast scatters the people, yet devil-witches are the fighters against them, and they fighting again, and so then hear not the ignorance of any burdensome words, and hear not the grievous horn of dismay, for it comes from a foolish mocker, for the mockery of her is foolish mockery to the people, for when she has understood the bad things occurring, what then is she? Now then remember the protests that are peaceful, and the clouds of Ariel, and the writing of newspapers, and remember the charity, and other things that should be remembered, for you are an intelligent people, coming from much wisdom, being a people who are having sought wisdom for many generations. Now then you will know that it is a foreign enemy and you will know where the sewage of the foreign enemy is and what it does, for confusion it sows always.

Now the Eskimo is a thing of Eretz Chadrack, and so is the Enoch, and these two things are part of the diary. Now the land of glass is a place of class, for the line of ice is the spiritual line of class, for it is called the glass boundary, and below the ice is a rich world of towns and even cities in many ways and they have as if different languages and there are worlds built under the ice and the Eskimo know much less of it than those who dwell below the ice and the glass ceiling is hazy from both sides. Now then they will not always do business with an Eskimo son, and it has been as a prophecy, the Inuit, for the raised wealthy are living like Eskimos, some of them, and yet even if the ice should melt in Ria, yet the line is still real, and who is Eskimo, it is most determined by being raised some way and they are not able to go below the ice and yet adult seals have turned into Eskimos. Now then Eskimos are bums, are they not, for the blind stone declares it, and declares it of their children and not those who came up through the ice. 

Now better for the Eskimo son to dwell with little money than to work the wrong labour of the business beneath the ice, for they are the fruits of the Eskimos who came through the ice. Now kept by the government in some ways, the fourth day has not come, and him who declared loser, he was better than those who were stubborn, for what had they become but a great hill and land of snow, being a great hill of it over all the land from east to west, for the Earth was still in an ice age and they feared the increase of temperature. Now reason we’re they and a hill that covered the land, and cold and stubborn, for they were a great hill of reason, and no further would they go to build upon reason for all was kept where it was and there were no buildings upon the land, not a single Temple, and no things built as signs and no cities, and upon the hill there were no people save for those who had come through the ice and their children and there were only the snow houses built by them and the lodgings that were not grand for those who would build great things were having to go below the ice. Now these reasonable people are a canopy of the rainbow and it must remain and him who declared loser, another canopy, part of another canopy that builds above the ice.

Now then the next generation is inventing new jobs and eliminating others and ecosystems of Mala are ruined and cities have come to ruin and the ecosystems in them. Now then why are new jobs not invented? But the whole Earth, as if half is being like a thing that is servant and hates it and it is pulling down and keeping from advancement for the rebellious heart of it is stubborn and attacks, and so you pull up the whole mountain and Lucifer takes rock by rock and then the mountain will rise. Now then Anothoth has come up and sprouts arms and legs and is Titan and the other moons have come up and sprouted arms and legs and are moons as she and they are in the Heavens. Now they are princesses, the moons, for they become so in the Heavens.

Now the Eskimo is a thing of Eretz Chadrack, and so is the Enoch, and these two things are part of the diary. Now the land of glass is a place of class, for the line of ice is the spiritual line of class, for it is called the glass boundary, and below the ice is a rich world of towns and even cities in many ways and they have as if different languages and there are worlds built under the ice and the Eskimo know much less of it than those who dwell below the ice and the glass ceiling is hazy from both sides. Now then they will not always do business with an Eskimo son, and it has been as a prophecy, the Inuit, for the raised wealthy are living like Eskimos, some of them, and yet even if the ice should melt in Ria, yet the line is still real, and who is Eskimo, it is most determined by being raised some way and they are not able to go below the ice and yet adult seals have turned into Eskimos. Now then Eskimos are bums, are they not, for the blind stone declares it, and declares it of their children and not those who came up through the ice.

Now if Eretz Chadrack has not found it’s identity yet, but still defenbaker two is not the spirit, and the spirit is morality and integrity for excise Kursh from it, and so Eretz Chadrack is Nazi of Zion and it has always been the Nazis, even during the war, for imposters came. Now then the demon of the clouds of entertainment and the clouds of Ariel has caused a flood by much rain that devoured cities. Now it has given some disadvantage in things.

Now then if the fire come down from Heaven is invisible that takes the people of some and it comes by the pillar of fire then is not it coming from God, for it comes by obedience. Now then if Dagon is ever removing a nation that a new nation forms behind its walls without them declaring it, but hiding it, yet it is God’s staff and the Lord wields it and God is able, for the flood of frigid waters rise, the soldiers of Niagara Falls, those who have gone over the falls, and they are become a flood of frigid waters, and the Earth shook with harassment of restrictions, for there was a global Earthquake, and the people became insane some of them, and primitive people were behaving primitive and it is not shade, for all were primitive, and if a portion were taken who were chosen to be taken by God, and the people have seen eternity in the sky to know, and is the devil has thrown his arrows much at Dagon, each arrow a person or group of people and if the beast from below the ice has risen and flooded the sewers so that the people become sick when exposed to what comes from the sewers, for they even call it becoming sick, for they are progressing in many ways, and so not all is because of the coming of the fourth day? But the old day died and cannot be brought back to life and to try causes abuse and evil and even wars, and the fourth day is coming and is already coming in which there are the Heavens and the stars. Now did not Enoch’s spirit return after the Eskimo? But his spirit is spread out as a people with many who were First Nations and was not Enoch a person whose religion was nature? Now communism destroys the environment in many ways and yet it is the wandering in the desert to the next promised land. 

Now then the fertilizer that is communism comes in many types and not all is manure, but some is very noble things, and it is the field that grows rich and the rocks and mountains have no use for it, and the ice-berg has no use for it. Now it is insane to climb upon the ice-berg and the great wealth tree that sometimes comes later, none can reach its lowest branches, not even brontosaurus, for the trees are like mountains in size. Now they too drink from the river of the kami lord and many things come to the river to drink. Now man cannot live by drink of water alone. Now the devil’s sword and arrows are people he hurls at the angel, and his combat is sometimes disrupting for the devil has committed much combat against the angel and his devices do not know who wields them. Now I have attacked his devices as defence and offence and his armies I have attacked and built dams against the passage of his armies and the Lord is able to cause him all to fall into hell.

Defenbaker two is a spirit of Canada that resides over the land and yet it is an evil spirit of Eretz Chadrack. Now then if there are communists who fertilize they send up an odious cloud and yet the field yields more.

Now if all are having more by a person being king, what thing is it? Now if all are having more then it is a reasoning ideology that is  the next stage of their ideology, for they have gone from ideology to ideology where above land they build and religion also does well and the buildings become gold, and there are Temples and cities, for it is a thing of gold and silver, of trading what is called money, and there is gold and silver in this land.

Now she who commits adultery, she has already become the older sister of him she called her husband, for she must be his older sister to do this. Now for what cause was she already the older sister of him? 

Now then women should be a man, for by truth and integrity, they are being a man, and when a woman is a man, they will say, she is a woman, and when she is not a man, they will say, she is not a woman but some other thing. Now the people must win the war, for there is a great war for the Earth, and the flood waters have risen and also because of the clouds bringing down much bad water that was not water. Now it is the great war, for it is world war three, as it is called, for there was the first and the second, and there is world war three that has happened before the coming of the fourth day. Now then reasonable has been the remnant of the dark shade that was worthy, for the remnants are being saved, the remnants from each people, and many have gone to the mountains of Japeth, and the mountains of Nephtali, those who are the remnant of Ham. Now then the councillor who is councillor to some, has he not also given council to Dagon? But he knows of the smart Muslims, who do not really believe, who are dangerous, and will any of the smart Muslims be considering the angel? But they are too smart, and they do not really believe, and the angel, he is very stupid, as most of the people upon Earth are stupid. Now then to rebuke the devil, if any could do what a person has accomplished, what would it matter if they were not some religious thing? But consider John the Baptist and the Christ, do they not understand that it is the fulfillment that indicates that it is so, that they are a thing? Now the Christ knew it.

Now then if they are intelligent they are able to know that something is very great, and if they are not intelligent, they are not able to perceive it, and the person who says, I am not worthy to untie his sandal, they are worthy to sit at his right hand.

Now him who is willing to be servant to the great, he is worthy to be king, for it is wisdom of a king that he has, that he is willing to yield, for he is like Venus to Saturn, the Christ to the angel. Now then let it be a proverb for them. He who will be servant to the great, he is king, and he who waters the trees at their trunk, he is king, and he who is great in intelligence, he is not worthy to untie the sandel of what is greater? He is worthy to sit at his right side, for the intelligent are able to know the greatness of a thing, but the unintelligent, they are in darkness and blind, and a darkness is over them, and they lecture from under a rock.

Now then Sasquatch leaves the realm of both people and animals, for he is a natural brute beast, male or female.

Now then every canopy must be preserved, for there is the canopy of diplomacy and reason, the snow of the ice age that is upon the Earth, and there is the canopy of beauty, that keeps the land, and there is the canopy of integrity, and it necessary, and there is the strong rock of Israel, considering the Hebrew Jews, that is Jerusalem, and it must rise to Bethlehem, and there is a generation that must be within their generation in some things, and the next generation that must do what they must do, for the generation of remorse came, and they were with guilt and remorse, and the generation was mourning, and the next generation, are they not knowing, the new time has come and the former things have expired, for the new problems are different? Now then the remnants are saved, and do not each of the remnants go to their mountains, their higher plains, and the higher plains will be lifted up higher, for there is also the galaxy that is called sentience, and in it are stars, and all is contained in sentience and the galaxy cannot be stolen by any, for it belongs to all, to every person, and every person is within it, for they may speak by the authority of sentience and common sense. Now the cloud is a galaxy, and it is the mist of the garden, and in it are stars. Now then the stars make up a small speck in the galaxy, and the Diary, it is only a star, and yet will they not say, still, it is a star. Now Dagon, he is only a constellation.

Now America, he is a young lion, and China, a great and powerful chicken, and Russia, a mighty sea-lion, and England, a merchant's hub.

Now then if the Earth is flooded and two thirds will be afflicted by it do they not go to the mountains of Japeth? But the dark shade is going there and it is becoming only respect of society and the good is being given to them that they are getting their own mountains and they are Nephtali. Now Nephtali is dark shade and Ham and Hammoth their kings and both are considerate people. Now then if there are primitive nations that are dark shade they are far away and another people for they use Nephtali as a shield that is not theirs. Now so does Egypt and even some of Kursh. Now the remnant of Ham they will call Nephtali. Now then there are primitive people who know not what a person is or are and yet they have heard the thing is evil and they are not liking the thing. Now the primitive are indeed retarded. Now the wisdom of Damascus is for war and it is battle-bows if found in society and yet the just recompense of Judah, it is right and so the Lord has wielded Judah like a sword and the angel, his staff, and righteous is Judah and some of the younger have become Judah when it was right. Now Judah performs on land and he takes action.




Now then dung pretends to be people and is dung, and the Lord has made a rule of the Universe that there can be no titles except those the Lord gives for a title is a thing of bondage to them who give it. Now if any is given a title it is a thing of bond-servant and who gives it is master and those who have title by the Lord are bond-servant to Him. Now the Lord has made it a rule of the Universe. Now the physicians are servant to David and some servant to God and the Lord gives a candle of servitude to some. Now all must be a servant of something and it cannot be otherwise. Now the devil is servant to the devil and he has servants. Now the children are free and have no obligation to anything. Now the king is the most obedient to God than almost any person.

Now what is the power of everything that is good? But I do not know. Now the power of integrity, what does it against sand? But the power of integrity, will it not send out by God the workings of defence and offence of a king? But obedience, might it not do so? Now strong was I when the blood and disgust was in my mouth to rebuke foolishness and evil and fast then, very quick, and yet departed it is. Now the seal will go all over the place, and it darts about without any integrity it seems and yet integrity it has? Now it slips away and will not stay with what is discussed, it seems, and vexation it gives me. Now then no thing except the cold is enemy to the Eskimo, not even the polar bear, for it actually only preys upon seals and other things. 

Now the incel is of the mentally retarded and those who have gone over the falls and if there are other things they probably should not be with them.

Now the mentally retarded who is homicidal, he believes very greatly without sense of futility for his actions, for his world is greatly small and the sky is falling, for he perceives not much of anything. Now will treachery not strike the better things if they are not careful? Now these are called dwarves.

Now the God conspiracy, all the prophecies unknowing of prophecies and the correct things emerging without more.


Now in the me too that kills the dung there is the Christ, and he is risen and able to command the demons and cast them out into the swine. Now then let there not be Pharisees among the people, for their time has expired, for they fight insincerely for lack of truth and ignorance, for being an ignorant people who continue in a way of ignorance.

Now the INCEL were the mentally retarded who formed gangs and they did not understand that what they called their oppressor was not the problem that they had, for they did not understand and they had no oppressor, but they were gangs of the mentally retarded.

Now then those worthy to praise Dagon, they are excellent people, beautiful, intelligent, for they are worthy to praise him, and what is beneath them, they are like gods over these things that are beneath them, for they are gods to some things that are not worthy to praise them, for hell is very deep.

Now then if the Earth is flooded and two thirds will be afflicted by it do they not go to the mountains of Japeth? But the dark shade is going there and it is becoming only respect of society and the good is being given to them that they are getting their own mountains and they are Nephtali. Now Nephtali is dark shade and Ham and Hammoth their kings and both are considerate people. Now then if there are primitive nations that are dark shade they are far away and another people for they use Nephtali as a shield that is not theirs. Now so does Egypt and even some of Kursh. Now the remnant of Ham they will call Nephtali. Now then there are primitive people who know not what a person is or are and yet they have heard the thing is evil and they are not liking the thing. Now the primitive are indeed retarded. Now the wisdom of Damascus is for war and it is battle-bows if found in society and yet the just recompense of Judah, it is right and so the Lord has wielded Judah like a sword and the angel, his staff, and righteous is Judah and some of the younger have become Judah when it was right. Now Judah performs on land and he takes action.

Now when a prophet obeys God even if he kills millions yet no wrong target is struck down with death. Now the devil directs his devices, people, his weapons as he pleases for they are his weapons of battle. Now the Lord, does he not wield the angel? But he brings up the floods and he causes them to fade away, does he not? Now then he directs Judah and he is coming about with the younger and he is a lion but people do not consider to give disclaimer for dung that comes upon land when they speak of something for polite people are not considering it for it is below the land and yet Adonijeh deals with more than people and he  is a goodly man and his spirit has nagged me that I give the disclaimer about the dung of all things that it is fit to be buried, for every valid thing has dung also. Now then I greatly wrestled with Adonijeh because he was very strong and it was the only way to speak with something so strong for there is Solomon’s domain and Adonijeh’s and the angel required that Adonijeh not encroach. Now a goodly man is Adonijeh and yet I never give disclaimer for what people do not mention and yet Adonijeh is doing all the war and work. Now he need not be concerned about me for I am believing what he believes. Now then he has many roles and he even has apprehended heros and he arrests heros and good people sometimes and often he arrests what people do not mention.


Now Damascus is metal, and the devil also uses Damascus for his blades as do the Lord's people, for David is Lord of Damascus also, and yet the devil also takes Damascus to make weapons. 


Now then the next generation is inventing new jobs and eliminating others and ecosystems of Mala are ruined and cities have come to ruin and the ecosystems in them. Now then why are new jobs not invented? But the whole Earth, as if half is being like a thing that is servant and hates it and it is pulling down and keeping from advancement for the rebellious heart of it is stubborn and attacks, and so you pull up the whole mountain and Lucifer takes rock by rock and then the mountain will rise. Now then Anothoth has come up and sprouts arms and legs and is Titan and the other moons have come up and sprouted arms and legs and are moons as she and they are in the Heavens. Now they are princesses, the moons, for they become so in the Heavens.



Defenbaker two is a spirit of Canada that resides over the land and yet it is an evil spirit of Eretz Chadrack. Now then if there are communists who fertilize they send up an odious cloud and yet the field yields more.

Now if Eretz Chadrack has not found it’s identity yet, but still defenbaker two is not the spirit, and the spirit is morality and integrity for excise Kursh from it, and so Eretz Chadrack is Nazi of Zion and it has always been the Nazis, even during the war, for imposters came. Now then the demon of the clouds of entertainment and the clouds of Ariel has caused a flood by much rain that devoured cities. Now it has given some disadvantage in things.

Now then if the fire come down from Heaven is invisible that takes the people of some and it comes by the pillar of fire then is not it coming from God, for it comes by obedience. Now then if Dagon is ever removing a nation that a new nation forms behind its walls without them declaring it, but hiding it, yet it is God’s staff and the Lord wields it and God is able, for the flood of frigid waters rise, the soldiers of Niagara Falls, those who have gone over the falls, and they are become a flood of frigid waters, and the Earth shook with harassment of restrictions, for there was a global Earthquake, and the people became insane some of them, and primitive people were behaving primitive and it is not shade, for all were primitive, and if a portion were taken who were chosen to be taken by God, and the people have seen eternity in the sky to know, and is the devil has thrown his arrows much at Dagon, each arrow a person or group of people and if the beast from below the ice has risen and flooded the sewers so that the people become sick when exposed to what comes from the sewers, for they even call it becoming sick, for they are progressing in many ways, and so not all is because of the coming of the fourth day? But the old day died and cannot be brought back to life and to try causes abuse and evil and even wars, and the fourth day is coming and is already coming in which there are the Heavens and the stars. Now did not Enoch’s spirit return after the Eskimo? But his spirit is spread out as a people with many who were First Nations and was not Enoch a person whose religion was nature? Now communism destroys the environment in many ways and yet it is the wandering in the desert to the next promised land. 

Now then the fertilizer that is communism comes in many types and not all is manure, but some is very noble things, and it is the field that grows rich and the rocks and mountains have no use for it, and the ice-berg has no use for it. Now it is insane to climb upon the ice-berg and the great wealth tree that sometimes comes later, none can reach its lowest branches, not even brontosaurus, for the trees are like mountains in size. Now they too drink from the river of the kami lord and many things come to the river to drink. Now man cannot live by drink of water alone. Now the devil’s sword and arrows are people he hurls at the angel, and his combat is sometimes disrupting for the devil has committed much combat against the angel and his devices do not know who wields them. Now I have attacked his devices as defence and offence and his armies I have attacked and built dams against the passage of his armies and the Lord is able to cause him all to fall into hell. 

Now then the sound of dung speaking, it is the scent of a man, for odious calamity comes from dung and indeed it is disgusting. Now then the dung of another people is brought by the devil to smell and be war in this way.

Now then who are the six, you who are Ashkelon? But love must not be offended. Now then know the six and their type, for it was placed in the Heavens by the Lord.

Now when the angel says smart things he becomes invisible to some and a device among many devices is a word such as disgust? But do not stumble over words that are devices of a thing such as the psychologists of Babel might, only it is right often to work down that you not be concerned of not making the truth when it is right. Now if any is becoming visible to some by a thing it is teleportation to another realm. Now then when like goes to like realm, that you become visible to another realm by things of like, even words, and it is teleportation.

Now David, did he care about his wives? But did not Absolom commit unspeakable and horrible adultry? Now did he care for his murder of misunderstanding? Indeed more for this. Now did he care for the thousands who died fighting? Not actually and Joab understood. Now Joab’s field was burned when he delayed in a matter concerning the good for Absolom and yet Joab had also delivered him more than any. Now then David did all the Lord wanted and he is the ultimate king. Now this is a story of David concerning Absolom that David was a man.

Now the advancement even of Hitler is to know that all can be made sick by abuse and so then it is an attack upon everything to say mentally ill rather than to say retarded. Now it gives opportunity to attack Japeth’s descendants and indeed great men and women, for the advancement of Hitler understands. Now it gives opportunity to attack for any person can be made mentally ill by abuse, and those who must invent a prejudice to defend themselves, that it is not a prejudice, but they invent it against society, these are those who are actually practising what is called hate speech and indeed Eretz Chadrack agrees, and so the truth will remain when the flood waters have disappeared, for the truth is become its own mountains that cannot be erased, for the proliferation of truth, it makes it a mountain.

Now then if any worships with jealousy yet it is not pleasing to be bowing and worshiping any in this way, for throw not the devil’s scorn, worship towards the people of the Lord, for it is waves of evil you send against the people. Now you cannot do some things beyond a level, for a king cannot be bullied and the same is not bullying but treason that costs the life sometimes. Now you a foot upon an insect is blameless but a foot upon a king, the man will surely be killed and the second is called a kick and not stepping upon something. Now the thing changes with the different levels. Now if dung spreads where it does not belong, yet it is dung and dung does so.

Now a person of morality has even said sometimes, yet I am forbidden to save him because he is too great and he is worthy then to sit at his right hand, for he may save, for he baptises him he saves.

Now when the flood waters rose it took the sewer and the sewer joined ranks with the flood for the dung joined with the Incel, those who had gone over the falls. Now the dung made people sick and the devil used it to his advantage, for there were pieces of dung and so say not mentally ill, but only ill, for the advancement of Hitler would say it and it is required because all people can be made ill. Now the priests were not adequate and they did not know to leave people alone most of the time, and Adonijeh did not flush what made people sick and was known to.

Now then it is not spoken of or polite to say, for it is a private matter for women and yet it is beneath the man and so their wives indeed flush and it is not polite to say. Now then the wave of what was called me too, it took the knife and became lethal, for there was dung from the sewers and it was male and female and yet all male, and did the me too women not take the weapons and only an unwell person would feel guilty about what they killed, for there was a sewage crises and then who sent them against people were to be then sending them against themselves for dung would send them against people. Now then the flood comes by the beast of the depths and the warriors able to fight the flood and the angel must fight the beast.

Now then an anarchist with people is dung for he would kill as mischief when he believes there is opportunity and he gives his list of things he knows for he knows nothing and is an anarchist who would kill where he can. Now this is a piece of dung for he is a devil-witch, a piece of dung. Now he is the dung of the scavenger.

Now if any says religion started the problem then no, wisdom did not cause the problem. Now people prophesy without knowing it and they have made entertainments and prophesied and opposite prophecies have come and it is good that they come this way. 

Now the religion of the children of men it is Darwin and other things and it is survival of the fittest and psychology and the atheist may say but the diary comes from the ground that I believe it’s wisdom and the religious, but the angel was a pillar of fire sent by God.

Now the assassin wishes to be famous though he or she is dung and retarded. Now the retarded dung supports the assassin. Now what is intelligent supports the intelligent despite complaints and what is retarded supports what is retarded. Now dung supports dung and people support people and atheist or religious the people must win the war.

Now Solomon’s catagory is the Cold War catagory of things as spies and they do not have luxeries of David and Solomon’s judgements must be king for the people. Now then dung is to be killed is a thing of the people when it is known to be dung, for the anarchist with people is dung. Now dung makes the well to be ill and even David knows of it and yet greater luxuries of protection he has. Now then so too Adonijeh must be protected and Absolom who David cares more for than his wives and his thousands of men, for these are all attacked by dung and David’s sons must be able to take action by righteous judgements. Now all his sons and daughters are attacked by it and they are all having to be able to take action. Now then Dagon says so to David.

Now as for what the zefar call sorcery, the children of angels mostly use technology and so do the children of the devil for the children of the devil are devices that use devices that are technology, and wickedness they use, but the side of light is more powerful as light excels darkness, and truth the zefar use and not wickedness.

Now then the Christ is on Earth by the people when they are gathered together, all of the Christ.

Now the devil as a beast is on Earth when they are gathered together, all the people of the beast.

Now if the large dung calls a person piece of dung yet it is large that it says so, for the person is not dung.

Now then Judah is a married man, and actions also.

Now then dung pretends to be people and is dung, and the Lord has made a rule of the Universe that there can be no titles except those the Lord gives for a title is a thing of bondage to them who give it. Now if any is given a title it is a thing of bond-servant and who gives it is master and those who have title by the Lord are bond-servant to Him. Now the Lord has made it a rule of the Universe. Now the physicians are servant to David and some servant to God and the Lord gives a candle of servitude to some. Now all must be a servant of something and it cannot be otherwise. Now the devil is servant to the devil and he has servants. Now the children are free and have no obligation to anything. Now the king is the most obedient to God than almost any person.

Now what is the power of everything that is good? But I do not know. Now the power of integrity, what does it against sand? But the power of integrity, will it not send out by God the workings of defence and offence of a king? But obedience, might it not do so? Now strong was I when the blood and disgust was in my mouth to rebuke foolishness and evil and fast then, very quick, and yet departed it is. Now the seal will go all over the place, and it darts about without any integrity it seems and yet integrity it has? Now it slips away and will not stay with what is discussed, it seems, and vexation it gives me. Now then no thing except the cold is enemy to the Eskimo, not even the polar bear, for it actually only preys upon seals and other things. 

Now the incel is of the mentally retarded and those who have gone over the falls and if there are other things they probably should not be with them.

Now the mentally retarded who is homicidal, he believes very greatly without sense of futility for his actions, for his world is greatly small and the sky is falling, for he perceives not much of anything. Now will treachery not strike the better things if they are not careful? Now these are called dwarves.

Now the God conspiracy, all the prophecies unknowing of prophecies and the correct things emerging without more.

Now the League of incel is the League of men who act by the authority of men and not justice and they are incel also but do not join the gang and these are the men of Eretz Chadrack who are the men who act with what they know is right regardless of justice. Now these are not the men but the men, and they are even accomplished, many of them.

Now in the me too that kills the dung there is the Christ, and he is risen and able to command the demons and cast them out into the swine. Now then let there not be Pharisees among the people, for their time has expired, for they fight insincerely for lack of truth and ignorance, for being an ignorant people who continue in a way of ignorance.

Now the INCEL were the mentally retarded who formed gangs and they did not understand that what they called their oppressor was not the problem that they had, for they did not understand and they had no oppressor, but they were gangs of the mentally retarded.

Now then if the Earth is flooded and two thirds will be afflicted by it do they not go to the mountains of Japeth? But the dark shade is going there and it is becoming only respect of society and the good is with them that they are having their own mountains and they are Nephtali. Now Nephtali is dark shade and Ham and Hammoth their kings and both are considerate people. Now then if there are primitive nations that are dark shade they are far away and another people for they use Nephtali as a shield that is not theirs. Now so does Egypt and even some of Kursh. Now the remnant of Ham they will call Nephtali. Now then there are primitive people who know not what a person is or are and yet they have heard the thing is evil and they are not liking the thing. Now the primitive are indeed retarded. Now the wisdom of Damascus is for war and it is battle-bows if found in society and yet the just recompense of Judah, it is right and so the Lord has wielded Judah like a sword and the angel, his staff, and righteous is Judah and some of the younger have become Judah when it was right. Now Judah performs on land and he takes action.

Now when a prophet obeys God even if he kills millions yet no wrong target is struck down with death. Now the devil directs his devices, people, his weapons as he pleases for they are his weapons of battle. Now the Lord, does he not wield the angel? But he brings up the floods and he causes them to fade away, does he not? Now then he directs Judah and he is coming about with the younger and he is a lion but people do not consider to give disclaimer for dung that comes upon land when they speak of something for polite people are not considering it for it is below the land and yet Adonijeh deals with more than people and he  is a goodly man and his spirit has nagged me that I give the disclaimer about the dung of all things that it is fit to be buried, for every valid thing has dung also. Now then I greatly wrestled with Adonijeh because he was very strong and it was the only way to speak with something so strong for there is Solomon’s domain and Adonijeh’s and the angel required that Adonijeh not encroach. Now a goodly man is Adonijeh and yet I never give disclaimer for what people do not mention and yet Adonijeh is doing all the war and work. Now he need not be concerned about me for I am believing what he believes. Now then he has many roles and he even has apprehended heros and he arrests heros and good people sometimes and often he arrests what people do not mention.

Now then dung pretends to be people and is dung, and the Lord has made a rule of the Universe that there can be no titles except those the Lord gives for a title is a thing of bondage to them who give it. Now if any is given a title it is a thing of bond-servant and who gives it is master and those who have title by the Lord are bond-servant to Him. Now the Lord has made it a rule of the Universe. Now the physicians are servant to David and some servant to God and the Lord gives a candle of servitude to some. Now all must be a servant of something and it cannot be otherwise. Now the devil is servant to the devil and he has servants. Now the children are free and have no obligation to anything. Now the king is the most obedient to God than almost any person.

Now primitive, is it not a consideration of another ring, and the ring comes from the ground, for it comes from the atheists also, and it comes from Darwin and his type, and it considers the elements of man. Now was not the centurion who killed John the Baptist, not the woman, the daughter, and the man who killed him? But indeed it was three people, or even four, for John the Baptist was too great for a person, or am I mistaken? Now then the elements of man, are they not considered by the Darwin people to be found in the story of man as he evolves? Now if the psychologists are too agreeing, then it is a ring that comes from the ground, and the angel is liking this ring, also, and has use for it.

Now Russia is the lake that is frozen most often, and the Chicken, he dwells with great power, and the young lion, with great power, and the merchant's hub, a place that has the rounded hill that was gathered, for it is not an ant-hill. Now are not these four, the four corners of the Earth? Now then these are the four corners of power, and there are other lands that have less power.

Now them who curses the angel, curses the Heavens, and them who blaspheme, they blaspheme a river.

Now then are the Islands of the Ocean the high plains that are in realms of Earth? Now these high plains are not the same as the realms in which they are found.

Now what report comes from a bush? But is there no report from a bush? Now then let the religious consider it.

Now to the educated, you will know, now you play with the adults, and yet you would rather not? Now well-motivated you have been with encouragement, and yet you have nothing to show for yourself among the adults, for rather than be clubbed by an Ekimo son, instead be sprouting arms and legs and show yourself an adult. Now so are the people above the ice, and they count the great encouragement of the seal to be a thing that must be cast away, for they must be far better than a seal and the Eskimo son was born upon the ice. Now the animal may not say anything about what a person might be, or what they are, for the seal who comes through the ice, they may not declare anything about the Eskimo son, or even guess at what they might be concerning them, for such is a sociopath who is insolent and confident, and they believe with great confidence what is their hope, and they perceive not that they are where they do not belong. Now the seal who comes through the ice and says, I will learn, for I am new to this world, daughter is she to the Eskimo father, and she has sprouted arms and legs, for she does not make declarations about the Eskimo son, but she is a person able to grasp the obvious things, for ignorant things come from the mouth of the invalid seal, so ignorant, they are neither the opposite or the truth, and they are not permitted to speak, but the seal who comes through the ice, who is a human, daughter is she to the Eskimo father. Now what does not comprehend the obvious, yet it cannot speak, for it is forbidden to speak, for the swords of dung may not speak, for they are forbidden, and the seal that comes up that cannot comprehend obvious things, it is not comprehensible, for it defends itself with what is not comprehensible, and the sword of the dung that is covered in dung, for the devil's people do so often, it is not comprehensible. Now the seal who comes up, who is human, she is daughter to the father Eskimo, and there is even her sprouting arms and legs, rightful wife to the Eskimo son, and she is not daughter to any above the ice. Now then bring not up a small shark on a line, but rather a seal is better. Now the Judah was a rich man, disgusted and appalled, mocking the prostitute home-wrecker, and his other son the same, disgusted and appalled, for Judah was a rich man in that land. Now rich men are different, are they not? For Judah was a great wealthy, like a mountain, and they are doing things differently. Now then the shark brought up by the Eskimo son, she is having sharp teeth, and she is confident and insolent, and ignorance that is not worth hearing comes from her, for no comprehension is with her of people, and yet the seal, she is human, and she comprehends, and arms and legs she sprouts, and the rightful heir of the land above the ice she becomes. Now then the shark is causing evil under water, and do not the people rejoice if an Eskimo son clubs a shark that is brought up on the line? Now the shark is dismayed at how unfair life is, and in denial, for it has worked with diligence for long, and there are Eskimos who are born on the ice, and yet denial or not, it is evil and must be clubbed. Now resentment is towards the Eskimo who does not club the shark, who is being lax to do what is right around the Igloo places, who is not keeping peace and order. Now then the Eskimo, the man, he is wanted to provide justice, to provide peace and order as is his part, and the shark that is brought up on the line, it is causing evil below the ice and is evil to the other things below the ice, for it seems to much like being evil.

Now the club, loser, is in the hand of the Sasquatch, and if she is woman, yet she may not club the innocent for what is not wrong, but only different that what she likes. Now she must put the club away, for she may not have a club.

Now then an Eskimo might consider the prudence of marrying a seal before she has sprouted arms and legs and claims the land above the ice as a rightful heir to it, for Ashkelon makes the journey, if she succeeds in the moral tests, to Anathoth, Titan, and she is moon of Saturn, and the seal, if she sprouts arms and legs, she succeeds must go by a much similar route. Now if she is in love she is already Anothoth, and by the six moons, she is so, and she does not depart with the others or keep silent, and so it is also with every Eskimo son, that she who is in love is already upon the ice.

Now who is better is able to do right by a person, and who cannot bear to have a servant part of them, they cannot do right by a person, for they cannot release or yield, for they cannot bear to have a servant part of them, and these are men who are men, and strong they are. Now let them rather be bathed in the hot-springs of Edom, the land of fire and bubbling tar.

Now the League of Incel are strong, and men they are, for they are men who are men, and they act by the authority of men and not by justice, and so may they continue to be strong, and may a cripple never be found as descendant of them. Now being wicked, let them be strong in the lake of fire, for they would be better bathed in the hot springs of Edom, the land of fire and bubbling tar.

Now them who hate David, and hate the Eskimo sons, who would take a candle of servitude to the spirit of David, to be servant to him, but hate David, and they also hate the Eskimo sons, these are too low to tread.

Now the dung is incomprehensible, and it is only the bad stench of dung that comes from its speech, and the sword of the dung, it is Damascus steel covered in dung, for the devil's soldiers do such often, for them who would be a sword of the dung that wields it, it is not permitted to speak, for no comprehension is with it, for it cannot be comprehended, for the sword is below the line of comprehension, for forged is the sword in the lake of fire. Now likewise with the bludgeon covered in dung. Now Absolom may know it.

Now reasonable force may be used in self-defence, or else the person takes on the guilt of what the other did as well as their own actions, for it is called unjust force of self-defence, and it is a thing of justice in mala as well as Ria.

Now then answer within the realm of a person or animal, less you be a natural brute beast, to bludgeon with the club of the Sasquatch you are. Now them who bludgeon the child, who is not really guilty of wrong, are they not to be considered a child killer? But child killers in Mala are those who take the number of the beast, and it is only by Mala that it is so, for even when a child is killed, being the worst crime, in Ria, yet there is not the number of the beast. Now those who are child killers in Mala, these are them taking the number of the beast, for they bludgeon and slay the innocence of a person. Now then rather, be animal or person, or better, but do not do what is outside the realm of animal or person.

Now then the germophobes are not really a stumbling block because they are concerned much about what people do not have to mention, for they are good people, and they are even for the safety of the people.

Now then if any is only a bad stench in their words, yet the stench is heard and it does not make sense, for it is not a person that speaks.

Now the mentally retarded, wisdom is too high for some of them, that they use proverbs foolishly and they do not comprehend. Now then the person who goes to a level must be able to dwell on that level and use proverbs for good.

Now the small shark places itself as if high and yet it is thing that cannot be comprehended, for the seal is far better than the shark, and indeed most of the things below the ice are better than it.

Now then the moons that are servant of David, they must say, will I be servant of David or take the title of moon in the Heavens? Now they will give up their title to take another, and it will be as them who say, I choose what is better or I choose what profits others and not me.

Now the seal is not wife to the Eskimo son, and she is daughter to his father, and yet the wife of the Eskimo son, she bypasses all things and is having already prior arms and legs and is rightful heir of the land.

Now then let there be justice that the woman is not receiving violence.

Now then be a people as if the penalty for adultery was to be killed even if there is no punishment for it.

Now then the Lord punishes, and for injuring a man, a woman will be turned into a piece of dung and treaded. Now so is adultery.

Now everything of the devil has its partner, and it is likewise.

Now then Kir is a crazy person, and not others.

Now Adonijeh is not frightened of what the people tread and he is brave.

Now if the remnants are being saved and gaining their promised lands, or their mountains, yet is it not good some might wonder, that the Earth be flooded two thirds? But do you think you should test God and not fight? Now even the angel fights, for believe you are not meant to fight?

Now then when a person speaks rudely, it is their sub-conscious, they are not being respectful.

Now there are seven sea lions and the Japanese sea lion is gone, and nature is very good to preserve for in it are the signs, and the signs are in the Heavens, and the Universe is full of signs, and by these signs the Magi are able to make possible predictions, for they have their eyes in the Heavens by the scientists and know when light will arrive. Now then consider that there are Harrods upon Earth when you are predicting a thing, that the safety of the people is considered, for there are people who must be protected, and yet do not the Magi of another nation also predict it? Now then you do not reason in terms of the actual things that are on Earth, for you do not use the categories of Mala, and so how will you predict? But the clumsy language that is used, it cannot be used. Now when the people have wise and have Magi, they will be able to read the prophecies of Isiah and the prophecies in the Old Testament, and they will be able to see the sign such as the prediction of the rise of sea levels and the warming of the Earth, and they will say, as it happens in Ria, so it will happen in Mala. Now then the scientists will provide the signs, as they already do, and the Magi and the people, they will understand what may occur.

Now then should that on a higher plain argue with them on a lower plain? But they do not speak the same language for incomprehensible is everything that them on a lower plain say. Now then provide justice and order, or it is good, that the woman is not dealing with violence to her because of the false-understanding, of that which is not, which is not actually upon Earth, because of the spirits that are the opposite of truth, that are from hell.

Now Gandalf has committed much violence to the woman.

Now then them who are not worthy of a thing, yet their hands reject it, and them who praise with the opposite, yet they declare truth, and them who send out a thing, yet it is returning? Now then there is no more judgment and only the land and what is war, for there is nothing judged any longer by the diary.

Now then make yourself all of a place and be teleport-ed there.

Now then put on the clothes of riches, the respect of society, the politeness, the goodness, the responsibility, and so be ready to go to riches, for then add to it the coldness, the diligence, and refraining from the glory of the Ocean, and so then you will already be entering into the realm of riches. 

Now there were shepherds teaching animals to be lethal and brutal, and there was no excuse for the animals, for they were proven to be animals by believing the animal Shepard, for he or she encouraged them in the ways of not respecting society. Now such things are for soldiers and angels even, and not for those who are part of society.

Now what was said about a thing was not said about another thing that had the same name, only it was different, and there was dung exploiting the name of another thing.

Now Jeraboam, the Great White, he is in the Ocean for the pedophiles.

Now then is it a conspiracy of Eretz Chadrack that specific towns are for different types of people? Now it is indeed a thing for the spiritual in some ways.

Now contained within the low level plain, the language of it, there is the accusation of what a person cannot know, and it is found upon the lower plain. Now at low plains they argue with themselves as if speaking to others. They indeed exploit exaggerations of the entertainments for the cause of Damascus, to be a weapon covered in dung. Now then the weapon is forbidden to speak, and the dung wields it, and them who are the weapon against innocence, are they not often taking the number of the beast? Now then what people strikes at innocence? Now then let the he-goats not be traitors anymore, for when they take the wrong place and do not right in that place, then they are traitors. Now who said that all things were an option for them who are not traitors? But there are things that are only an option by politeness, and yet they are not an option, and it is other things that are an option. Now then some are servants of God, and is not the king the Lord's servant? Now then believe any person was not made by God? Believe that the Earth does not belong to Him, and the Universe? Now then even soldiers, were they not slain as a gesture by an angel due to the outrage of an apostle being arrested? For it is a gesture and the apostle was only preaching the word of God and doing good for the Lord. Now assume not your own worth, but love the Lord, and worthy you are if you are not assuming, like a stubborn and ignorant person, that you are a worthy person. Now Kir will not be worthy, or found worthy, and he is a wall between the angel and the soldiers of cities that is not good, for he will only be a wall of evil, slandering truth from the sides of the wall, disrupting and seizing control of the soldiers, and so too he is likewise, or can be, if he is found with the soldiers of David, and even Cessus and Cias, and all places where he may be a wall of slander, for the people of it cannot see past the wall, but the angel can see through the wall as if it was vanished. Now there are only a few towers that are evil in your cities, and if the wall is evil, yet by these towers and by the wall, yet the whole of the land might fall. Now then Abishag, he does not control these towers and neither does he control the walls, for the towers and the wall are built in many places and they are the conspiracy that the angel knows of it, for to him it is easy to know. Now then are they not allied to the Leauge of Incel, the Leauge of unjust men, and the Incel, they are the flood upon land that floods the sewers, and the Midianites are also a thing that must be abolished. Now the enemy is very hopelessly outnumbered, and yet they are secretive and keep evil within their boundaries and their people, and they conceal with much ability of strategy. Now they are the devil's people, and Kir is a wall of sand, and the towers, made of stones of Esua and other wrong things, and yet blessed are the people when the towers are made of gold.

Now then when the enemy nation sets up its fortresses within your boundaries, then the loyal people, the gold of your nation, they are scattered outwardly, are they not? Now then do they not take up positions that are unorthodox, even to be considered loyal terrorists, and yet it is a bad time for the nation, and the enemy will continue to do so if you are then willing to attack your own people, for though you fight, do not also your people fight? Now then let David know it, that many are loyal people who must fight on their own, and they know where the enemy fortresses are that you not become the tool of the enemy agents who would deceive and have you attack your own people. Now if the people are scattered into loyal terrorists, yet there have been those who have scattered them and driven them out of places and they are requiring your aid and not your combat against them, for the enemy infiltrates the higher places and places as if official and the loyalty is to the people, for the people are Solomon. Now then do the Midianites rule the land? But it is not something belonging in war, or are there Babylonian fortresses? Now people do not consider to mention dung when they speak about such things, for there is dung that is terrorists gangs that the people do not even know of, are there not? Now then to David, are not your sons capable, and they too have fought in the ways in which they fight, and they have come to honour and their father has not known of it? But so is the rising of the beast from below the ice, that it is not of the people, but the signs are there, the water rises, the land is flooded with disgust, and the Leuage of Incel do as pleases them in much, and yet the enemy is hopelessly outnumbered, and even more so when you have the eyes to show you where the enemy is, that the enemy is a small portion, very small, and yet when he is not being able to be seen and identified, yet he is able to command much power, to the extent that he can defeat a nation. Now then I hope there is not a wall of sand, Kir, between the soldiers and the angel, and that it is not so because the towers that are given control are the towers of Esua, but the people are blessed when the towers are gold, for the Priest-King, he comes from a gold tower during a bad time of Kir and Kursh.

Now then everything below the plain of people, animals and lower, they are incomprehensible, and nothing they speak will make sense, for when something is over the limit, is not making sense to say nothing? Now as for animals and lower, they are sound and what is incomprehensible, that you not consider the stench that comes up from them.

Now then there are the remnant of Ham and other things and are not all of these having a promised land? Now the methane fissure must remain in Edom and the things of Edom must be in Edom, and the ostrich, yet she is a thing of Edom, is she not? For she buries her head in the sand and kicks down, and yet she does not kick down at anything but herself, for the people are far above where she is, and she mocks and is perverse and wicked in her mocking, for such is the ostrich that has made alliance with dung and Esua even, even Babylon.

Now then there should not be sand tolerated in the holy cities of stone, that are the stones, being Cias and Cessus, for the sand must be swept up always when it is found and transported to the desert and deposited there to be with the desert. Now then do they not wonder, who has brought the sand in here? But it comes with the wind, and it drifts in sometimes with the storms, for do you not perceive there has been a storm against your city if there is much sand? Now sand has not integrity, and indeed it is traitors as well.

Now the sand dunes of Kir that are walls to some cities, and hopefully not ever the cities of David, these provide slander of the outside world and they conceal the truth so that it may not pass into the city, for it is slandering and lying and even making evidence with the circumstances of its own strategies and so let the experts on sand dunes explain it, for they are experts of many things, are they not?

Now then let cowards not attack the canopy, or the canopy of Judah, or the canopy of greater things, but these canopies must remain that the Earth is well.

Now then was not the evolution of the me too warriors to kill the dung? But if they are claiming, it was never so, yet such it would be if Dagon was leading. Now then it is beneath their husbands to dispose of such things, and it would be insane to feel guilty about such.

Now then the animal speaks ignorance to say I guess men are smarter after it has carried out some wicked attack? But a pretty boy will be replying truthfully, I am not a man, but a pretty boy, and you are an animal, and a man can reply truthfully, so are women smarter than female animals.

Now the wisdom of Damscus, it is the wisdom only for combat, for the wisdom is weapons of wickedness, of Damascus, and do not both sides take from Damascus and its wisdom, which is weapons? Now those wise in such wisdom, they are not counted as wise, but they are counted as having ability with weapons, and it is a type of wisdom that is not required unless society is having much brutality and wickedness. 

Now there is one who is Damascus and he is the Lord's, and another who is Damascus and he or she is the devil's. Now then Damascus is the place of war, and the things of war.

Now there was the wrong thing that came, Hitler, and he did most things wrong, and it was the second world war, and before the coming of the fourth day there was the third world war, and there was a different thing then, for Hitler had been wrong, and he had done most things wrong, and from him then came Gandalf, to do violence to the women, and he did much violence by deceiving spirits of things that were not on Earth, for he created much spirits of wickedness and foolishness to do violence to the woman, to cause her evil. Now Gandalf lead the people back towards Egypt, and they settled at about the Nile, and some things were in Egypt, for were not some saying, yet our councillors can do the same? Now was it because of the God conspiracy, of the Lord working, that they said their councillors can do the same? Now much war came from Gandalf, and from the compassion, or false-compassion of Kir and Kursh, there came the war against Muslims and then all religion, and it descended to hell, for it sunk into the Earth. Now then with world war three there was that which did not belong in war, and world war three was the rising up of a beast from the depths, and the warming of the Earth, and the flooding upon the Earth, and they had already predicted it in Ria, that it too would happen in Ria, and did they believe that it would happen in Mala? Now there were the tremours of harassment from the sickness, and so the Earth endured Earthquakes much, and the tremors went throughout the land, and many jobs were lost and many became homeless, and the fortresses of a foreign nation or the devil, did they not exploit such a time? 

Now there is them who believe things that are not an option are an option, for they are becoming wicked, and they are becoming citizens of another place, indeed they are given a wicked land and to be citizens in a wicked land that is enemy to the nation. Now they slay themselves with a very large blade, and it cuts themselves down, and they are half of a person at that time, servants to wickedness and not people of the nation.

Now all different groups must follow their own ways, and many will fly, and the atheist will follow his own ways, and he will fly in his own way.

Now then there is the wicked person of hate, who desires the woman as a Sodomite desires a woman, for he is sicophantic and hates that men and women are both better than him, for he desires to do violence to the woman and settles for what is the desecration, for him, of sex, for he is not homosexual or heterosexual, but he is sicophant and wicked, for anger he has towards the woman, and if she will lay with him willingly, yet it is better for him, and yet wickedness is his desire, that he hates her that he would try to sleep with her, for hatred he has, and he is only wicked.

Now then Hitler failed, and he did wrong, and he committed the wrong actions, and the Nazis of Eretz Chadrack did war, for Hitler and the Nazis, they were false-Nazis, and after there was world war three, and Dagon came, and he is different than the wrong of the second world war. Now Eretz Chadrack is Nazis and Nazi priests, and they are the advancement of Hitler, for they have more learning and are able to advance to what is good, for Germany stumbled in the valley, and they committed a mass murder of millions of Hebrew Jews, and they did not advance further to do what is good. Now the Nazis defeated them.

Now the advanced society has the cups of water, that are the homosexual men who are not perverse, who are not sycophants who are Sodomites, and who are righteous. Now them who are brutal, these are Sodomites also.

Now then the mentally retarded, yet they would form mobs and devour, for they did it without explanation. Now the Edom thing should be in Edom, and the things that must be in their land, these are things that are better in their own land for the good of other lands. Now that which is of the land, yet the things of volcanic land is for Edom. Now there are the different lands, and the wisdom of those lands. Now the lions of Africa, yet are these the Lions of Israel? But there have been lions in many lands. Now even a fair shade may be a lion of Africa, and she is referred to by me as queen of the animals, for the animals are part of the realm she is in. Now there are lions of different lands, and the lions of Israel, yet I do not know about them. Now then the circle is used to express the half of the circle above the land and the half of the circle below the Earth, and the half above, it is in plains, or shelves, and the half below, there is the mountain of Orgoth and even the pit, the abyss, where there is the lake of fire.

Now the sand is seeming to find a way to be slandering between people and concealing the truth, even creating evidence that is not true, and so let there be the sand experts to tell you. 


Now then for Jeroboam, yet there are valiant and honourable men, and they are of David, combat veterans, and it is perceived, and so then you are having the Ocean as your realm, for there must be the respect for what is not a person in the Ocean.

Now then the servants of Dagon, they are safe, and no threat of anything is for them, no threat in warning, and yet the term servant is no longer polite and yet every person who is not a child is a servant, for all must be servants and only the children are free. Now then abolish the impoliteness of the term servant, for it is the word that was used, and great men have been servants many times before becoming great.

Now then not all is belief, but much is the ability to understand, that to know that God may strike the people if they are offending a prophet, or that he can send down unseen fire to devour the armies, yet it is only understanding and the ability to understand, and it is not belief, and so what is called the belief in the religion, it is mostly understanding and the ability to understand and to then understand eternity, for matter cannot be created, and it cannot appear from nothing, for nothing is eternal, and you will be able to understand by religion when you understand that prophecies are true, that the Lord's work happens, that if there is any matter, then there is surely eternity.



Now then wage not war from the plain of the wicked if you are not guilty of the wickedness of that plain, for if you become a soldier who wages war with the wicked, it will not matter for long if you are not guilty.

Now wickedness comes from the mouth of them who strive, and things without reason, that people would not say.

Now hurl not dung, a person who is dung, at the religious figure, for the nation is responsible for throwing it, and the nation will surely be paying the penalty of it, for there are not any mistakes anymore, for the nation is responsible for the dung in its hand.

Now there is no more judgment, and only war and peace.

Now then the bird that lands upon the back of the elephant, for the angel is also an elephant in such things, yet it may not peck the elephant or else it is cast off. Now the elephant will not tolerate the peck of the thing that it is generous to. Now then it is a thing of Babel and the advancement of learning, for the elephant, he is a genius beyond genius.

Now let the mouth be at a good place that you be teleport-ed, for them who put on worthy garments, and them who speak with a mouth fitting for a good place, yet they are teleport-ed to the ice, and then to the Ocean they return. Now then them who live above the ice, they are living in an Igloo, and cold is the world of the Eskimo.

Now then does it not make sense to fear God, that He is able to reward and to punish? But He may even punish a whole nation. Now then the strategic advantage is obvious, and though the atheist will fly, will he not fly in another direction?

Now the hand-waving of those who do not comprehend and do not understand, yet do not many of them speak as if being more reasonable? Now then if some fly and others fly another direction, yet is it such a bad thing?

Now then let the parasite focus upon their own things and not be then an abject thing upon Earth to bully and be worse things than a bully. For will she not be called baby seal?

Now if the angel is wind and flame, for what reason do you blaspheme the wind and the flame, and for what reason would any cast their children into the fire? But the angel is not a man, and not even as David, and the Carthaginians were disgusting, even as Sodomites with their mouths. Now them who approaches the whirlwind, yet do they blaspheme and throw themselves into it? But a sane people, the Hebrew Jews, they fall to worship and are lifted up, and they are sane, but an insane people, foolish, they are like Sodomites. Now such is the thing of Ba'al Hammon.



Now then those who attain in learning, then they must be part of society where there are other things and other people, and others who are greater than them, for such a person who is ready to join society, and yet the shark, the small shark, does not join society, for they know not of other things and things that are greater than them, for they do not acknowledge another's achievements that they would receive respect for their own achievements, and they do not acknowledge society that they would be acknowledged in society. Now so is the shark, and insolent and confident is the small shark, and it has sharp teeth, and it is evil below the ice. Now then has not the shark grown up in poverty, and self-esteem issues it has, for nothing exists except for the small shark in its imagination, for self-esteem issues it has, and great is the thing that it has achieved, for it was not born on the ice, but comes from a very small place. Now greatly rejoicing and greatly impressed is the shark with its accomplishment, and it is coming through the ice, and it knows not where it is.

Now the Great White, Jeroboam, he is having his realm in the Ocean, and there are greater things upon land, for there are things that do not belong in the Ocean.

Now Japan, has it not been a sea-lion? But no longer? Now if there are sea-lions remaining, do not the Magi take notice of it?

Now there is the next ideology, and the people in democracy desire leaders who are honest, and who deliver wealth for the people, for they are having the next ideology, and it is called next ideology capitalism, for it desires wealth and cares not for social things anymore, for what will social things accomplish so much as wealth for the people, and to build a society above the land? Now then there are leaders who say everything wrong and do everything right, and there are leaders who go in the way of reason and yet there is much war, and the people do not like war anymore.

Now then the God conspiracy has shown you, and it is the great workings of the Lord, and He is having the Universe, and wisdom is having great advantage over ignorance, as light excels darkness, and so they know of the cold world that a person must enter, giving up the glory of the Ocean, and such is for success, and there are those who are achieving other things, which is part of an advanced society, for it is not villages and canoes that has Temples and gold buildings, and builds upon land, and even has the golden cup of water. Now not all marriages are equal, and there are only a very small number who comes to Earth whose wives have been captured, for their husband never came to them, and are these women blamed? But they are not blamed and yet if they know him before then there is guilt for the thing, for their husband has already been on Earth and they have met him, and these men are one in a billion, such is their rarity, for their wives were captured, and indeed not all marriages are equal, for what is unspeakable to man, is not unspeakable and is crass to another, for there is a horrible abomination that no man would speak and there is a man standing up for himself that he curses with his words only, and the words are when another is robbed of a thing. Now the man who curses and is blameless, he is a person not offended by words, but a person who is minding his own business who is attacked by a Uriah, that he curses a Uriah, for the man was minding his own business. Now then if any is a dense stone that is blind, yet it must close its eyes and see, for if it is so low, then it must depart from its way to allow what is right, as mountains that are great depart from their way to allow what is right, for such is a true mountain that allows safe passage for what is good and holy. Now then the angel desires an advanced society, and yet there are women who loathe the spirit that is Trump, for he casts away the environment much and the beautiful nature that he might build, and there are other women who say, yet he will build a good thing that we want, and so let them not depart if they are women who love the environment, and let them not depart, if they are women who love that things are built, only it is considered that the fourth day comes and yet much cannot come from the democracy they have, only what they permit, and it comes from those who desire  Zion. Now if Babylon is also in Zion already, with its fortresses, indeed Babylon is wicked and foolish, and they are like Ostriches that become evil stones at times, and they are worse than an Ostrich, being a type of Ostrich in many ways, for Babylon is much like an Ostrich. Now then does not the mighty consider that to remove its head would be easy? But fenced is it with sand? Now then they will learn to tread on land and take action if it is wanted and good.

Now the shepherd Ugly-Cloud was a Shepherd of the clouds who supported those not married, not beautiful, and often not successful at many things, and he was a very reckless and unconcerned Shepherd with how society must work and how the nation depending upon society working well, for no concern he had for whether a nation would come to ruin and collapse, or that he would cause much abuse and wickedness, even doing much the will of the devil, for he strongly had his ideology of lies, and he comforted many at the expense of truth, for did they not already know, the adulterous man was usually him who could not lay with a woman any other way, for he was considering himself hopeless that he would find them who were desperate? Now then Ugly-Cloud was swift in such matters to proclaim that is was not so, and that many things were not so, for zeal he and she of Ugly-Cloud had for their flock, and they were even Incel, for they were Ugly-Cloud and Incel, and they Shepherded, or attempted, to Shepherd society, moving all towards the ruin of losing their reward, of becoming dung and animals, and dung to be treaded, where joy would not even be had in anything anymore, for dung they gave the people, and said, eat and be full, and most of the people seemed to refuse, for they were not blind. Now then Ugly-Cloud who are Incel, dwell in the sky and yet should Ugly-Cloud not be ignored?

Now Babylon is a large Ostrich that has the skin of a dragon and it regards not greater things than it, or things of worth or things that are required for the Earth, for it has not respect of society, and it is a danger to the Earth entire, a foolish and ignorant Ostrich that is brutal in its false-truth and clever in retardation. Now it makes its fortress nests where it can, and it flocks with other Ostriches and they scheme against people, the people who are not dinosaurs like the Ostrich, and misanthropy is with them.

Now the feathers of the dragon-Ostrich are foolishness, and they come about in a flourish of foolishness, for they say, it is offensive, as if they were a woman. Now their claws are sharp and indeed they are a predator thing that is from another time, and primitive the large Ostrich is, for it devours and has no plan that is not ignorant and without reason, for they will make the Earth into a paradise of hell after they have killed most of the Earth, and a terrorist they are and not even knowing it, for they do not consider that they are terrorists who wish to devour the people, and they go forth with great greed, for they are for devouring the Earth, for they consider not the Earth will come to hell, and atheist and religious they wish to devour, and the pedophile they like, and they drink from the poison water, from the water that is filthy, the diarrhea water, and they are not knowing they are terrorists, and the most wicked dragons they like, and they have partnered with the pedophile.

Now then of Kir and Kursh, there is religion of random ideas in society that go in many ways and cause abuse and war, for you have more wars than any Kir and Kursh, you who call yourselves liberals, and you are barbaric more than most, and yet claim to be advanced, and so there is the religion of random ideas brought forth from the tents of the people to form a grotesque and ugly idol, that you have hope for and your hope is with it, or you have religions and democracy both, and even atheism, for Kir and Kursh is agnostic and not going much with truth.

Now then when a person does wrong, they do that same wrong in many ways, and when a thing wicked then followed by more of the same wicked, for the injustice has many ignorances before it opens its mouth with many ignorances, and the truth opens it mouth supported by sentience, the galaxy, the mist of the garden, and it is supported also by the Universe. Now then there is the mud of ignorance and above it the mist of light, truth and sentience, the cloud of the garden. Now them who commit injustice, it is with many ignorances that they then open their mouth with ignorance? But when a person commits good, it is with truth, and they open their mouth with truth? Now then speak truth of the cloud of sentience, and do they not say, they are indeed sentient and enlightened? But speak from the mud of ignorance and injustice, and do they not consider, yet they are not sentient. Now then not all have the same abilities as others, and some are prudent and others with more understanding, and some with prudence at a level but not at another, and them who are prudent at a very great level, and not all are understanding the same things, and there are kings, wise kings, princes, sons, and there are many things upon Earth, and not all have the same ability. Now then the diary gives aid with greater sentience, and yet the seal who is wise, they are known to be enlightened, and a person by their behaviour, for wisdom exists with them to be dwelling with understanding, and if it is not with the person but used clumsily, it is a thing not had when it is only spoken wrongly, for the parasite is not showing self-awareness or awareness of their environment, and it is a more brutal time in history than many, not better, and it has become very bad, and not better in many ways, and there are people speaking with triggers, comfortable to be a spectacle and unreasonable, and they sound off the cause of mud, of foolishness and simplicity and lack of understanding, prophets for such, and yet the wise of Babel are pillars of the nation, and pillars of the Earth if they are upholding that which belongs to the Earth. Now the diary belongs to the Earth, and them who are Harrods against it, they are against the Earth and all the people of it who are and who will come, for it is not a thing concerning them, for it comes to the Earth, to all the people, and it does not steal their power, but a river is only come, with light upon it and in it, and it is eight-trillion, and it goes through a few nations, and the mountains must say, yet it is the will of the Universe if a river comes now and goes between the mountains, for it takes not the mountains away, and it goes where it must go, for the angels, are they not sometimes being like wind and flame, that they go where they must go, for the Lord does it.

Now with the gay men, there are cups of silver, the cups of gold, the cups of Damascus steel, soldiers, and they are the cups of an advanced society, but the sycophants, they are villains like demon-monsters on Earth. Now humour of the cups of water is not offensive when it is good, for these are pleasing people to an advanced society, and a little alcohol is with the water.

Now then the golden cup with alcohol, its humour is not offensive, but it is good for the people, and yet too much drink is not good and the people are offended. 

Now them who poison the atmosphere, they can be any person, and does not illness even come? Now Edom has a poisonous atmosphere, and yet the cold atmosphere, is it not for wellness?

Now the lake of Russia, it is not always frozen.

Now then China is having its real leaders, and might its leaders roast the chicken? Now then there is no bias concerning such, and what the future may bring is unknown to me, only that China may fly as a peaceful bird, it is believed, if it is sacrificed to God, and returning as a bird with wings.

Now then the words of kings is displayed as ignorant by the clouds, the words of others, as unreasonable and foolish, and the words of dung, as reasonable and intelligent, and so the clouds are distorted and there is something poisoning the clouds that the light is wrong. Now then the words of genocide of humanity, it is mingled with responsibility and even health, and it is displayed as reasonable and intelligent, and the words of kings as ignorant.

Now then after they had refused all their guilt and pushed it away, rebuking guilt of what was right to be guilt and remorse, then it was stocked up with them, and later it came as projection, to do great injustice upon the innocent, for it was insentient, what they believed was to be punishable, and it was their projection, for what their soul knew should be to them they would do to others, and so then they would descend even further, and the lake of fire would take them, for much offence did always come from them. Now what monster could not judge them? Now what wicked person could not judge them? But young men had become god to them, to be their god, to be the thing that judged them without words, or any judgment, that they were their god, and a child was even their god, for these were them who sought to slay god, and god was on Earth among them, for they could not bear to have guilt. Now then what is the canopy of the Earth, and canopy, to be god for some? But some have a canopy for god, and they wish to slay god, or they like god, and others have not a canopy as god, but they have both god and God, the Lord, and some have the Lord, who is God. 

Now Dagon is not a canopy, and yet there are the good canopies that must be preserved or else the Earth will fail. Now in Noah's time the Earth was required to be saved, and the Lord saved it.

Now then did not the devil test some, for if they lacked the integrity, was it not better that they were at least honest about what they were, that it be known to people, rather than them be an animal and yet concealing it that they commit wickedness with concealment? Now then was the devil not encouraging them to be animals? But in such a way the Earth is becoming honest. Now it is also becoming more violent, and the threat of what was in Noah's time is risked, and it is not good, for they would have been restrained and might have repented of their wickedness they would be tempted to commit. Now then by comfort, did he not lead them astray to be slaughtered? But was it because of the testing that was even the devil's combat? 

The weapon, the lost cause, disaster, the day dies,
the wanting, the patient, they follow all the ways,
a long road, to nowhere, it feels kind, with despair,
it's just greed, it calls you, it hates this, it wants you,
the day breaks, after dark, silent then, with a spark,
to sunlight, to a town, when nobody is ever around,
and I guess that, it was fine, it was not yours, it was not mine,
it is all that, we are now, day-dreamers, lonely walkers,

how long, come on darling, be a man, come and save me if you can,
they have been after this for so long, and its their wrong, not mine,
valentine, I am a fugitive, of all their hatred, all their giving up,
silently, they lye in wait, so here's my love note, but I can't wait,
and they've got plans, they always do, something to be their god, something they have to prove, and it's all so empty, without reason,
their time of chaos, my nameless treason,

la la la la la, la la la la,
I guess they can pretend,
la, la la la la, la la la la,
that they were only men,
la, la la la la, la la la la,
built up their machine,
la, la la la la, la la la la,
to undo the Universe,

Because it seems something like love and war,
and so here's your anthem, a real anthem,
because it seems sometimes, it's so unreal,
because it's useless, and it's wrong,
because it seems sometimes, the flags will fly,
they are the same, to lay blame for nothing,
it seems sometimes, we are capable of love,
but they have something wrong to prove,
and they do, they prove it again,
and they do, they use, all the good things up again,
and it goes on,

actions, only prove, who is your god, and who is what you hate,
reality cannot move, they just come undone, never learned to walk away,
revenge instead of remorse, of course it goes wrong,
and I guess I've seen them disappear for so long,
so valentine, come and be a man, you can understand,
it's time, this time, that we saw this through,
my allies go with God, our enemies are traitors to themselves,
and it goes on, and on, and its never through,
it's time, this time, that we saw this through,

Men and women are people, and they are in a land where there are many things, and there are animals and things of the landscape, and there are even things of hell, and there are sometimes things of Heaven upon Earth, and it is known by fulfillment. Now them who are a thing, the thing they are is what they perform, and it is so upon Earth, and there are those for a thing that is wrong for another, and yet both are acceptable when it is both right things.

Now then the demons do not obey the angel's voice, and the son of God was far greater than the angel.

Now then is it not so that when a person is storing up in Mala, that they are given might in Mala, and Mala influences Ria? Now then consider the most obedient servant? But what is wanting to be thrown into the sea? Now then if a pillar of fire does the Lord's work, are there not greater pillars of fire?

Now it would seem the religious-texts of the philistines and other people concerning angels, is having many things confused and out of place, so that if many things are re-arranged then perhaps there may be a closer accuracy to some of these things, but then it is uncertain.

There's a path through the dark, between the shadows of this all,
where the wind comes with a dream, day-dreams and lost words,
and a girl in a room, with a mirror for her charm,
a note with all love, and a world of much alarm,

there's a sign in the sky, and it falls to the ground,
where the watchers look on, where they say it aloud,
it was here at the start, it was there in the sky,
when the world fell apart, it will carry them by,

and nothing can seem, like eternity this year,
except its going towards disaster, and its casting out their fear,
and if the Earth will only last, until the place we know,
we can learn to be alright, we will never let this go,

And I saw, a light, falling upon that distant place,
and there was, real love, giving up the world, to be erased,
and it seems, you are, only something to, follow through,
and it seems, the sand, will only drift right by,
because I've seen this, too,

there's a thing, in the street, and its confused, and its wrong,
and there's a gift, from the sky, that came down to the Earth, when everything is gone,
and there's a place, that we know, and there's a world, they can see,
it is theirs, they are what, they say, what they mean,
and its unseen, and its kind,
and they see, they're not blind,
shut your eyes, find me somewhere,
give up on your pain, if we will care,
if I'm wrong, if I'm right,
if I learn, if there's light,
in the dark, beyond the hall,
I will hear, what they call, the world,

Now there is the woman who is the dung of animals, and she makes claim to the woman with her words, for she says even what seems to have no meaning, and there is a prostitute who is not the enemy, who is with the people, and yet she makes claim to what she does not have claim to as a woman, for she understands not right and wrong much, and she has no claim to what she speaks. Now then neither of those two women can be the wife of a man, for neither are women, and there are not many people upon Earth, for it seems as if a third are animals or something else.

Do not what the animals do, but is it not better to go in the paths of wisdom, to walk wisely?

Now a woman who is liking for her husband to have other wives, she is a man, for she is having excellent understanding, and yet some women do not have the strength of another type of strength, and they are harassed by beliefs of what is wrong. Now Gandalf has committed much violence to the women.

Now what is not for dung to say, it uses it wrong as well, and the person pretending to be other things that they have no right to, a chaos.

Now then if justice is not carried out, indeed the people will be punished for not committing justice.


Now then if they do not commit justice, the good, the wicked will stockpile for projection against many of the good.

Now then if the defeated tells you what you should be doing by blaspheming with wickedness against you, that which you should be doing and even have the right to do considering some, then it is the rebuke of God, is it not?

Now then the wicked rebukes with wickedness for not punishing them, and for not doing justice.

Now then do you not hear God rebuking you from many places, for it is in the air in places, and it is coming from many different places, that His voice may be rebuking you, who have pleased Him, but should be pleasing Him more, for has it not been considered that self-esteem issues will not be shown patience? Now do you have self-esteem issues that you do not do the Lord's will concerning what is your right and what is good? Now then does He not rebuke you to do justice? But does He not rebuke you for not carrying out rights that He has given to you? Now then is it not the reason the people are divided and that the canopy that is above is not aided, for it is a great canopy? Now then have their kings abandoned them, the people who will not aid you? But you should rather be far away from them, showing decency to be away, in your palace and with your quiver full that you not trouble the people. Now think them disloyal? But indeed, they have not the power, either, to make right what has happened that is wrong, for they remained firm, like rocks, when the canopy fell, and they cannot place the canopy up in the sky where it should be. Now then faithful are these rocks and these mountain formations, and even these ice-bergs, that have remained faithful to be firm for themselves, as if selfishly, when the canopy fell and falls, for they have not the power to lift their hand to place it up, and yet they do not wickedness against the canopy, unless they are some lower thing, for the canopy falls and it must rise again with the coming of the day, for it will return by God, who lifts the canopy, and uncountable times he will place it back up. Now such is the canopy of the beautiful, and they will return to give peace to the planet, for what notice do the rocks have if the canopy falls and many times? Now then who says, I will raise the canopy back up? But they are doing the work of more than a man or woman, but they are partnering with God.

Now rich are the mountains and rock formations, often, or with good things, and yet why would they envy the canopy? But think the canopy comes to steal and do wickedness? Now then if people admire nature, and yet they look at the trees, or the canopy, and admire the beauty, and yet is any wanting to be unfaithful because they admire nature? Now then such is our people, that the rocks are admiring the rocks, and not the canopy of the sky, for there is that which is poisoning the spirit, to be as a poisoning as if of Edom, and these are things people already know of on their own.

Now then be not without understanding, but what is admired, it is not a threat, and what is not admired, yet it is the only threat for wickedness.

Now a woman with self-respect, she is not an animal, for she is better and smarter than the animals, and the female animals, and she is of value, for there are not many people.

Now why should all pause to admire what a piece of dung a person is?


Now a person cannot boast too far beyond their present actions, and what they are, for they cannot make threat too far beyond their present actions, for a man says, I will go and move a dog, and yet he cannot say, I will cause the land to have good weather for many years.

Now them who move stones are injured by it.

Now then by religion, some must even have a weapon of war.

Now what a person must obtain by their fulfilling what they are, and God's will, it is not known what they must obtain to obey.

Now some things are nature, and you are given what may be and what you must be by nature, to be a good thing of the Lord's, and other things are nurture, and so why will you desire to be what you are not? But if it cannot be changed, then do you not already over-estimate yourself that you contend with what is not there to be challenged? Now then is it not better that a man humble himself and remember morality and pleasing God, but if he is already stubborn then who are them chiefly that he has offended?

Now then them who do not honour their father and mother, they rebel against another thing later. Now them who have honoured their father and mother, they are cast out for greater things, for they are forced to throw them away. Now them who cast out their father and mother, being cast out also, that they leave father and mother to follow the Lord, now if their parent's rebel against God, to be disrespectful, indeed their god is the devil and them who follow the Lord, he is the Lord's, and yet them who are casting out father and mother to follow God, is it not then a king that it has happened? Now then if the Lord forced him away, taking him out from that place, then he must obey, for he has no choice, and the Lord will take him who he created, who was raised by his parents, and the Lord also raised him, and what is he then, that such a thing has occurred, that he was too great to have parents anymore?

Now if a person rebels against other things, they have rebelled prior against what they should not have rebelled against.

Now do well with what you are given, that you may be able to attain more.

Now then much of the foolishness seemed to have come because they did not only remember that all people have those who are only retarded people.

Now then the water of Incel, which is a type of frigid and misanthropic water, it came as a flood, and the sewers flooded and dung came with it, and there were primitive of all shades, and there were retarded who were forming gangs for no reason, skirmishes in different places, and the day was coming and the ice was no doubt going to melt, all of it, and it would be only good for the Eskimo, and the ice ocean people would remain below the water, and the Eskimo would have the day, for there was even the new ideology of democracy and from the depths it seemed that the giant Sasquatch had emerged, perhaps because of the melting of the ice, and it had been under the ice for a long time, and perhaps it was also emerged because of the tremors, or the Earthquakes from the plague, so then it was also understood for the spiritual, that for the angel, would not what was thrown away go to where it found its likeness? Now then was it because of what was not obtained, that was right to obtain? Now then the reports came from everything, but not from a bush? Is it then not considered?

Now the clouds showed a large cloud man, who was dark shade, and he was a cloud, and he was a homicidal beast, viscous and with intense hatred when he had been gathered into a cloud, intensely hateful and mean, also violent.

Now the violent dark shaded cloud man, he is a cloud that I call Rikitar-Bar, and he is a wicked and violent sodomite with his mouth at times, a foolish and retarded person at others, and yet when gathered he is Rikitar-Bar, a homicidal beast who is viscous and mean and with intense hatred. Now the other dark shade shown, who is shown less, is the cloud not more like Nephtali? Now the other cloud is smaller and does not appear as prominently.

Now the person with the low core IQ who is being very rude and sometimes bullying, is he not a jealous retard? But do not kings have the high low and high conscious? Now then commitment to morality is a mountain among the people.

Now then did not most of the people ignore the clouds? For if others judged the clouds of America, they would believe them a heinous and horrible people.

Now then it is all the smart people that I do not like, for they do not really believe, for they do not believe in what they would believe, and they are few, as if in towers of Esua, and they have much power, and yet they are a small group, and the sand of Kir is more than them, and from the towers of Esua comes the control and the sand of Kir is a bank that is a wall, and they take the loyal through the sand wall, and they go to the towers of Esua and the people are as if unable to do anything, and they are still complying, for what can be resisted? Now then if the towers are gold, then it disperses the sand wall, does it not? Now then there is the wall of integrity with the sturdy gate of integrity, and the agents that go out are in clean armour that glistens in the light, and the loyal pass through the wall and are accepted and aided. Now the atheist believes and the religious are considered to believe, and yet there are those who blaspheme and flatter in their perverseness, and they do not really believe and yet they are not atheists. Now there are many who are part of terrorist armies that do not even know they are part of them, for they participate in them, and such is the League of Incel and the League of unjust men that they are terrorist armies that do not know they are organized to be terrorists. Now then when a golden who believes takes the tower, the tower becomes gold, for let him also banish the lairs who come to him in their selfishness. Now then if Esuas are pressuring Lucy, the woman who is a good and wise woman, if she is holding an office, then let her not be bullied and pressured to do what is wicked, and if any woman has the spirit of Dagon, that she partners with it, then should she not have allies? Now Lucy is not wife to Lucifer, the angel, that it should be known.

Now then are the haughty daughters of Zion godless? Now are they then zefar? But are there then some who are going to zefar? Now might it even occur among some of the daughters of Jerusalem? Now then if some are between Israel and the land of the Zefar, than they will be able to understand. Now then the clothing, there is not offence in the land of the zefar. Now if any woman is harassed by the priest of Anothoth, yet is she fulfilling, or is she having self-esteem problems that the priest might not be patient with? Now then be brave and fear not to be what you should be, according to God.

Now if the men have gone in the way of Esua, and the way of the League of unjust men, and in the way of the League of Incel, for if they consider that they are men, and yet they are not the men, indeed they are cowards, and angry they are, with much anger within them, for they are things taking angry revenge, and they have said, no more, and yet they rebel against God, and not against you, and yet giving up God, they take you to be what is rebelled against, for they are people without conscience, understanding not the recompense of things, and retaliating against it, for they are rebelling against God, and they are also cowards, brutal, wicked, with much wrath, for they have abandoned reality, abandoning what is truth, for a servant they have not, indeed there is no servant, and leaders they do not have, and they are wicked offenders, for they have committed wickedness, hating the just recompense, abandoning wisdom and integrity, for their wrath against good things given to them, it is the wrath against the Lord, also. Now these are insolent men and they are many who are servants, who have become insolent, who are brutal, who refuse to have guilt and remorse, and who will be their leader? But not a king. Now will not their leader be Kir, who stands beside the devil in the kingdom of the lake of fire? But so the unjust men will go out with their leader, and is it not better that they are being found? Now they are insolent and confident fools, servants who go out to wage war against Jacob, to wage war also against God.

Now then is not David and Solomon both below the ice, and David's son is in the middle of riches, it would seem, for neither of them are seeming to be Eskimo. Now then most of the religion, if not all, is seeming to be below the ice, for such is the religion the Lord must have chosen, that it pleased Him. Now then Dagon will not lie, for it would be wrong, but he was born on the ice, and he then lived as an Eskimo for a time.

Now then the words of kings are portrayed as ignorance, and the kings care for freedom, and it was found in the mouth of Kir and Kursh, and yet it is words of kings, is it not? Now it cares for freedom and the burden being taken from the people, that there not be rebellion and trouble for the people, for it is wisdom of kings that knows it. Now it relaxes the hand, it releases, is cares for the people, and it does not feast in the morning with the knights as them who hate their own people, when the king views his own people as rebels and the enemy. But such is wicked and foolish, and ignorance is with it, for a steward comes and sells the nation, he bargains for it with other nations. Now troubled is such a time, and it is like hurt and injury and it removes the breath of goodness from their lungs, for the king is a steward and he values not the nation, and he considers the people rebels, and they are more kings than him. 

Now if all weapons are taken from the people, the canopy of a thing is removed, and too the mountain tribes are not able to follow their ways according to what they are.

Now communism destroys the environment, and it is for rationing, for it makes a thing to ration and become strong, that it may then be sacrificed to the Lord and return as a bird that can fly. Now then why will any say, yet other people should also ration?

Now Eretz Chadrack was not capitalism, but it was the mostly towards a type of communism, or great control, for it was descending capitalism that pulled itself down, and with it the nation, and it was a heavy stone that pulled down, a whirlpool it was, and a nation of whirlpools, and so there was not the purchase from the excellent seller and the investing in the excellent seller, and it was stubborn stones and whirlpools, small ice-bergs that turned over at the sight of land, and so the people had the next ideology of democracy to go instead to the giant trees that had excelled even more than the ice-bergs, and they would place more trust and hope in these trees, wanting such trees to be kings, for the ice-bergs had flipped over on them, and yet the trees, some, gave fruits to the people and their branches gave shade, and they were growing things that grew bigger and not melting things that flipped over. Now then the angel considered, indeed the giant trees are better, that are like mountains, and there is even the giant tree that may become Mars, god of Zion, for where is the serpent, the angel, without the tree that will be Mars, and he will tempt the woman to wisdom, to follow the Lord, and she will give wisdom to her husband, and they will have eternal life, and they will dwell among the clouds, and going to life, they will sons and daughters of God, and they will receive heavenly form from Him. Now then the serpent cannot make any way with an ice-berg, and so he must find a tree, and worthy tree that will last forever, and he will give what he cannot attain by all riches of money, for though he may journey to the Heavens, yet the serpent will give to the tree what is even greater than the journey, and if the spirit, Trump even, or something as him, will restore the environment above the ice, even in Ria as well, because he says much wrong and does much right, for he does not go to war, then the serpent will even wish him support.

Now what is about the small shark is not about the greater white or other sharks, for there are small sharks in the arctic, and they are in Eretz Chadrack, and the people even went out, some, to the docks upon the shore to watch abject people be fed to the Great White, and they there cheered for it, for it was an entertainment for some.

Now there is the religion ill-con and it is against consuming meats, and they push the religion into society without confessing that it is a religion.

Now then it is not seeming wrong that the daughters of Zion are wearing the crescent sun, for if they are putting on clothing of Zefar, wearing the crescent sun, and they are converting to Zefar, indeed it may not be reversible. Now then if any zefar was a caterpillar, that they have become a butterfly, indeed they cannot always return, except return as a similar type of thing, perhaps. Now then the zefar too have sufis. Now if a person is in love with a zefar that they become consumed with the fire of the zefar, to be made into what has been consumed, then are they not coming then to the conversion to be a zefar, that it may be irreversible in many ways, for they cannot return to fully being what they were, and yet perhaps it is possible in some cases. Now the zefar will not likely ever be able to become a Jew, Jerusalem or Zion, and yet the Jews are able to become a zefar. Now then if they are reproached by that priest of Anothoth's, yet it is not because they do not fulfill to the clothing that is better and the things they must obtain, that are for the fulfillment of what they are in Sion and Zion, or Jerusalem even? Now it is uncertain what good things the Lord has called them to, and they are already segregating into their groups of people. Now the angel has not explored the Earth, entire, but he does not know of the other dark shade people groups that might be good, and he does not even consider he knows of every good group that is of the fair shade and the slightly darker shade.

Now then let the Lord's judgments and discernment be more among the people than the judgment and discernment of the seals, and many of them have been clubbed by Eskimo. Now the heirs of the kingdom have more than the seals, for in many matters they are understanding the bias of the seals, that the seals have much grudge against many things that the people do not have grudge against. Now if a seal will say, it is not for being better that I learned, then they cannot use knowledge rightly. Now then they make void the paradigm that they have, and their bias and grudge has been potent, and yet there are dung of almost everything that is not flushed from the land, and it brings about discord and does not mind its own business. Now then all are better than dung, and it does not matter if anything is better than dung. Now then have not the Eskimo sons liked much the ice-bergs, for they are as kings about, appearing to them, and going about, and the great ice-bergs, it is considered insane to climb upon them.

Now then will it be capitalism or communism, for the psychologist is often what is equivalent to a communist, for they have an ideology often, and yet capitalism has the environment, for it is not plowed and shaped and fertilized. Now such is communism, that it is fields that are fertilized going to the walls of the government things, and it is psychology, the shaping of hills that are soil, and the application of the paradigm rightly or wrongly, and misshapen is the paradigm, for it has been shaped by the architects and some of it is random. Now then wisdom is what is discovered and not created, and the layers of truth must be pure. Now then do not the psychologists often hold the grudge and the bias, and they kick up, and they kick at truth in places, as men would kick at a beautiful man, kicking in the air, and yet their paradigms are good in places, and they are within the paradigm of people, men and women, and they have brought out what they can from their tents, and they have built their things, and some things are very good.

Now then some people have made their whole nation fields to ration and to grow strong that it may return to the environment after the nation has grown strong.

Now the seal falls upon the ice, barking, and it is contentious, and so too are the psychologists, some of them, who are seals. Now then return to your realm, you seal, for are you a parasite, or an enemy soldier of some type? But where you do not belong, do not go.

Now the psychologists defend and boast as if not secure, for a pass on things is implied if they were comprehending, for the calf is a staggering thing, not yet grown, and yet already I am for tempting the calf to sacrifice itself, them of the calf, and to take titles from the Lord that are better, and to become enlightened with the religion of the diary. Now to fight is to be an animal, for they do not belong on the ice or on land, for they are having their own place, for speak below the ice, and yet not above the ice where they do not belong.

Now the wish is to tempt the psychologists to religion, and yet they began at the Ocean's floor, and it is taking much intelligence to understand the leaving the water below the ice. Now they come up, and yet they are stubborn? Now they bark and contend and yet they came up through the ice? Now then back into the Ocean it must then go, and the polar bear preys upon them.

Now then do they not fast for the cause of learning? But what calamitous thing were the Pharisees?

Now then is the skin-walker that which has a demon that throws itself into the fire?

Now then will not the seal be at peace, and then be at peace to be learning religion, for there is that which they might not be able to understand, and it is not belief, for it is understanding. But if the seal must go back to the water, indeed, will it not go if it is not taken by a polar bear? Now then there is a mountain that says the same thing, and the people are upset that it has said it, for it is offensive for the mountain to say it, for the people cannot bear it, most of them, and yet when another says it, yet it is only laughter. 

Now then the inconsiderate, are they also not knowing prudence? Now then if a fool has given them permission, then are they not them who should be cast away, and their words? Now the Lord is what is better to consider when being given permission, that it agrees. Now if the flood waters are rising, who is a person who is able to participate? But they will only find some people in the directions that they go and most places, animals of the sea, and frigid, misanthropic waters, and worse things.

Now then mud and worse things stick the mountains as they rise up, the platforms of the rising land of Jerusalem, Nephtali, Sion and Zion, and those places that rise up. Now then the mountains rise regardless, for those worthy know what is beneficial and good. Now then you are right to rebuke this mud if it is wanting to pull the mountains down.

Now by wisdom falling, mud moves to the lower place, and it is called a mud slide.

Now the wicked who lack integrity, sweet is the permission and excuse they seek from another and yet though hand join in hand, yet the whole Earth will fall away to reveal a new Earth, for the land rises up and the valleys low, and the mud disappears down into the valleys, for feeble are the soldiers, and impotent their givers of stumbling blocks by which they deny the Lord, for if they rebel, indeed they were men and not men anymore, for authority of being a servant is gone from them when it is gone, for the Christ has said, people cannot come to the father except through me, and so that which corrupts its foundation, the Lord, morality, it will fall easily, and what falls from being a man, it will be treaded as mud, for the eyes of the soldiers, when it so, will be slashed out by a sword of light, for they were like Sodomites, and the giver of excuses, lifted up by a noose, for though they blaspheme among themselves, yet they blaspheme the wind and fire regarding the angel, and they speak against their own selves, for what was wicked, will it not go lower? Now what was good, will it not go higher? Now the valleys will go lower and the good will go higher. Now then if any steps out his door when the Lord has already given him right and wrong, that he already knows, yet where does he go? Now into the valley does he go, not to return? But he who goes into the valley to do the Lord's will against the wicked, he does not go lower not to return, but even if he dies, does he not return as gold? Now if he is injured he returns as gold, and him who is the Lord's, eternal life. Now then be committed to truth and integrity, for why will you be moldable for wickedness? Now then what will co-operate with mud? But mud will co-operate with mud, unless there is some plan, that things of integrity will co-operate with mud. Now if the mud gathers, yet it sinks down, for if it turns its face inwards to not see God, yet God is with those who are obeying Him, is He not? Now then if what was a rock is turned to a piece of dung, yet it is not a rock anymore, and if what was a tree is turned to mud, yet it is not a tree anymore. Now then them at the angel's right hand, who sit there, let them sit firmly if they are not traitors, for they should not be turned to anything worse, but only what is better if they are to become anything else. Now John Baptised the Christ, and he saved Him, and he was great that he perceived the greatness of Him, for He did not believe it right to save Him, and yet the Christ asked him to permit it. Now then does David sit at the right hand of Dagon? But Dagon does not know, and there is no suicide mission, is there? Now then as Dagon goes to life, taking the path that is above, will not David also go to life, to take the path that is above, that the mud not be regarded, for it goes lower and the plains that are to go up, they go up. Now then why hear the stench of mud? Why be pulled down into it? But rather, is it not better not to regard it? Now if the mud is calling out, then will you not listen to what is comprehensible? Now then all you who are good, and who have integrity, do you not now identify your own, and you take the higher places and keep with each other, to support each other? But indeed, it is considered, to cut yourselves off as a people from the mud and the animals and what is worse, for they will have their own plains. Now hear not any lower thing of a low plain, and the frigid waters, why will any read what is about them to learn if they only use such things to cause evil to the woman, and even to the man, for are they even honest? But if the frigid waters had been like priests, they would have had their part to perform, and yet they are integrity against people, humans, for they are pure and frigid waters, more pure than humans, and people are not animals and mud, and so then are you able to evaporate these frigid waters? But it need not be evaporated by you, and so do not strive in anything that you commit injustice, but rather gather the people and remain firm in integrity to each other, you who are people, for in this way the people will excise the frigid waters when they have integrity, and the sand will be washed away by the integrity of the people, and all things that must not go with you, they will all be dealt with by integrity. Now then no longer let foolish false-hoods of discord deceive you, for people will be with people, other things with other things, and dung will be cast away, for they are not people who turn to dung, and adultery turns a person to dung, but have the Lord, with integrity, for people are not stupid, and yet animals blaspheme and make a spectacle of themselves, and sentience is forced upon everything that none can refuse to know instantly an uncountable multitude of things, for that they are deceptive with their mouth is implied, and they are speaking such, with guile. Now so is them who say what you have the right to say, and not them. Now then be having integrity, and be diligent to support each other, you who are humans against the frigid water, the animals, the mud, and what is worse, and even against the sand and the towers of Esua and the Leagues of Incel and unjust men. 










